Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 5 Election Procedure Generally
7-5-601. Paper ballots — Form.

(a)

All paper ballots provided by the county board of election commissioners of any county in this state for any election shall be alike and shall be printed in plain type.

(b)

Each ballot shall be printed on paper with a perforated portion capable of being detached for use as the ballot stub.

(c)(1)

As ballots are printed, the portion that shall be used as the ballot stub shall be numbered consecutively beginning with the number one (1).

(2)

The number on the last ballot printed shall show the total number of ballots provided for the election.

(d)(1)

The heading on the front or inner side of each ballot shall be: “OFFICIAL BALLOT. Vote by placing an appropriate mark opposite the person for whom you wish to vote.”

(2)

If the ballot contains an initiated or referred amendment, act, or measure, the heading shall also contain these words: “Vote on amendments, acts, and measures by placing an appropriate mark below the amendment (or act or measure) either FOR or AGAINST.”

(e)

Beneath the heading on each paper ballot there shall be printed instructions that inform the voter:

(1)

Of the effect of casting multiple votes for an office; and

(2)

How to correct the ballot before it is cast and counted, including without limitation instructions on how to correct an error through the issuance of a replacement ballot if the voter was otherwise unable to change the ballot or correct an error.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1801n; Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 34; 2009, No. 1480, § 35; 2011, No. 1020, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section heading and the section.

The 2011 amendment substituted “below” for “above” in (d)(2).

7-5-602. Ballots — Number — Official — Marking device — Spoiled.

(a)(1)

The county board of election commissioners of each county in this state using paper ballots counted by hand at the polling site, paper ballots counted by an electronic vote tabulating device at the polling site, or paper ballots cast at a polling site and counted at a central location shall provide for each election precinct one hundred fifty (150) printed ballots for each one hundred (100) or fraction of one hundred (100) electors voting on paper ballots at the last preceding comparable election.

(2)

The total number of ballots required to be printed for each election precinct shall not exceed one hundred five percent (105%) of the total number of registered voters for the respective precinct.

(b)

A ballot shall not be received or counted in any election to which this subchapter applies unless it is provided by the county board of election commissioners under this section.

(c)

At all elections in counties that use paper ballots and in which those ballots are counted by hand, the ballots shall be marked using permanent ink.

(d)(1)

A voter who shall by accident or mistake mar or spoil any ballot so that he or she cannot conveniently or clearly vote on the ballot may return it to the poll workers and receive another ballot, not to exceed three (3) ballots in total.

(2)

Spoiled ballots shall be cancelled by a poll worker's writing “CANCELLED” on its face and initialing the ballot.

(3)

The cancelled ballots shall be preserved separately from other ballots and returned to the county board of election commissioners and shall be open to public inspection.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 36.

7-5-603. Counting paper ballots at the polling site.

When paper ballots are to be counted at the polling site, the following procedures shall be followed:

(1)(A)

In counting the ballots, the ballot box shall be opened and each ballot shall be counted in turn or by counting by offices and issues.

(B)

The poll workers shall witness the counting of the ballots and shall keep separate tally lists of the votes cast for each candidate or issue on the ballot;

(2)(A)

When two (2) or more ballots are found folded together, it shall be considered as conclusive evidence the ballots are fraudulent and neither of the ballots shall be counted.

(B)

If a ballot is found to contain marks for more than the maximum allowable number of candidates in any one (1) contest, the contest shall be considered overvoted, and it shall be the responsibility of the poll workers to determine the voter's intent;

(3)(A)

Upon the close of the polls, the poll workers immediately shall certify and attest the list of voters and continue the count to completion.

(B)

If a poll worker becomes sick or incapacitated from any other cause, the remaining poll workers shall continue the count until it is completed;

(4)

After the count is completed, the poll workers shall make out the certificates of election in triplicate and immediately post one (1) copy outside the polling site; and

(5)(A)

The counting of ballots shall be open to the public.

(B)

Any candidate or political party may be present in person or by representative designated in writing under §7-5-312 at the count of the ballots in any election for the purpose of determining whether or not the ballots in any election precinct are fairly and accurately counted.

(C)

The candidate in person or an authorized representative of the candidate or political party shall be permitted, upon a request's being made to a poll worker, to inspect any or all ballots after the ballots have been counted.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1807; Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 35; 2009, No. 1480, § 37.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section heading and the section.

7-5-604. Authorization — Election laws applicable.

(a)

Paper ballot voting systems that include electronic vote tabulating devices may be used in elections, provided that the systems shall:

(1)

Enable the voter to cast a vote in secrecy;

(2)

Enable the voter to vote for all offices and measures on which he or she is entitled to vote;

(3)

Permit the voter to verify in a private and independent manner the votes selected by the voter on the ballot before the ballot is cast;

(4)

Provide the voter with the opportunity in a private and independent manner to change the ballot or correct any error before the ballot is cast;

(5)(A)

Notify the voter that he or she has selected more than one (1) candidate for the office, notify the voter before the ballot is cast and counted of the effect of casting multiple votes for the office, and provide the voter with the opportunity to correct the ballot before the ballot is cast if the voter is legally entitled to select only one (1) candidate for an office but the voter selects more than one (1) candidate for the office.

(B)

Electronic vote tabulating devices used to cast and count votes at the polling place shall be programmed to reject ballots containing overvotes as described in this section.

(C)

When votes are cast at polling places and are to be counted by hand or at the courthouse or other central counting location, the county board of election commissioners shall provide a voter education program to inform the voters:

(i)

Of the effect of casting multiple votes for an office; and

(ii)

How to correct the ballot before it is cast, including, but not limited to, instructions on how to correct the error through the issuance of a replacement ballot if the voter was otherwise unable to change the ballot or correct any error;

(6)(A)

Notify the voter that the voter has selected more than the allowed number of candidates for the office on the ballot, notify the voter before the ballot is cast and counted of the effect of casting more than the allowed number of votes for that office, and provide the voter with the opportunity to correct the ballot before the ballot is cast if the voter is legally entitled to select multiple candidates for an office but the voter selects more than the number of candidates he or she is legally entitled to select.

(B)

Electronic vote tabulating devices used to cast and count votes at the polling places shall be programmed to reject ballots containing overvotes as described in this section.

(C)

When votes are cast at polling places and are to be counted by hand or at the courthouse or other central counting location, the county board of election commissioners shall provide a voter education program to inform the voters:

(i)

Of the effect of casting more votes than the voter is legally entitled to cast for an office; and

(ii)

How to correct the ballot before it is cast, including, but not limited to, instructions on how to correct the error through the issuance of a replacement ballot if the voter was otherwise unable to change the ballot or correct any error;

(7)

Permit the voter to vote:

(A)

At any election for all persons and officers for whom he or she is lawfully entitled to vote and no others;

(B)

For as many persons for an office as he or she is entitled to vote;

(C)

For or against any question upon which he or she is entitled to vote; and

(D)

By means of a single device, if authorized by law, for all candidates for one (1) party or to vote a split ticket as he or she desires;

(8)

Permit the voter by one (1) mark to vote for the candidates for that party for president, vice president, and their presidential electors at presidential elections;

(9)

Generate a printed record at the beginning of its operation which verifies that the tabulating elements for each candidate position and each question and the public counter are all set to zero (000); and

(10)

Generate a printed record at the finish of its operation of the total number of:

(A)

Voters whose ballots have been tabulated;

(B)

Votes cast for each candidate whose name appears on the ballot;

(C)

Votes cast for or against any question appearing on the ballot; and

(D)

Undervotes and overvotes by contest.

(b)

So far as applicable, the procedures provided by law for voting by other means and the conduct of the election in regard thereto by the election officials, not otherwise inconsistent with this subchapter, shall apply to the system of electronic vote tabulation as authorized in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 3; 1979, No. 738, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1802; Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 36; 2009, No. 1480, § 38.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “Paper ballot voting” for “Voting” in the introductory language of (a).

7-5-605. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning adoption by ordinance — costs, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 37. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 77, § 3; 1979, No. 738, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1802.

7-5-606. Approval of equipment — Specifications.

(a)

The State Board of Election Commissioners may promulgate rules for the administration of this subchapter and shall approve the marking devices and electronic vote tabulating devices.

(b)(1)

Any person or company wishing to exhibit marking devices and electronic vote tabulating devices may file written application with the board and request an opportunity to exhibit and demonstrate devices.

(2)

The board shall examine the marking device or the electronic vote tabulating device and file a report in the office of the Secretary of State of its accuracy, efficiency, and capacity.

(3)

If the board shall reject any device, the reasons shall be stated in the report filed with the Secretary of State.

(4)

Any person or company aggrieved by any finding or ruling of the board may appeal to the Pulaski County Circuit Court within sixty (60) days from the date the report of the board is filed with the Secretary of State.

(c)

After any device has been approved, it shall not be necessary that it be exhibited and approved again by the board unless there is a change or modification in the device that renders it incapable of marking ballots or tabulating votes in the same method of procedure approved by the board.

(d)

Marking devices or electronic vote tabulating devices not approved by the board or selected by the Secretary of State may not be used in any lawful election in this state.

(e)

No marking device or electronic vote tabulating device shall be approved unless it fulfills the requirements of this section and the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1806; Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 38; 2015, No. 1218, §§ 15, 16.

U.S. Code.

The federal Help America Vote Act of 2002, referred to in (e), is codified as 52 U.S.C. § 20901 et seq.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted “marking device or the” in (b)(2); and, in (d), added “Marking devices or” and inserted “or selected by the Secretary of State”.

7-5-607. Arrangement of polling place.

In precincts where an electronic vote tabulating device is used, sufficient space shall be provided for the use of the device, and it shall be arranged in such a manner as to assure secrecy in voting.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1803; Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 39.

7-5-608. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning sample voting materials, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 222, § 10. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 77, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1803; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 26; 2005, No. 2233, § 40.

7-5-609. Spoiled ballots.

Any voter who spoils his or her ballot or makes an error may return it to the election officials and mark another, not to exceed three (3) in all.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1803; Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 41; 2015, No. 1218, § 17.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “mark” for “secure”.

7-5-610. Write-in ballots.

In all elections in which write-in candidacies are allowed, the ballot shall permit electors to submit the names of persons who have qualified as write-in candidates and whose names are not on the ballot.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1803; Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 42; 2015, No. 1218, § 18.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “submit” for “write in”.

7-5-611. Preparation of electronic vote tabulating devices — Test — Disposition of voting materials.

(a)(1)

The county board of election commissioners, with respect to all elections, shall cause the electronic vote tabulating devices used for voting to be properly programmed and tested before delivery to the election precincts.

(2)

As soon as the election media are prepared, but no later than seven (7) days before the beginning of voting, the county board of election commissioners, with respect to all elections except a runoff election as described in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, shall conduct logic and accuracy testing by having all election media from each electronic vote tabulating device tested to ascertain that the devices will correctly tabulate the votes cast for all offices and on all measures.

(3)

In a runoff election, as soon as the election media are prepared, but no later than five (5) days before the beginning of voting, the county board of election commissioners shall conduct logic and accuracy testing by having all runoff election media from each electronic vote tabulating device tested to ascertain that the devices will correctly tabulate the votes cast for all offices and on all measures.

(b)

In addition to the logic and accuracy test under subsection (a) of this section, the county board of election commissioners shall conduct public testing as follows:

(1)

The county board of election commissioners shall provide public notice of the time and place of the public test at least forty-eight (48) hours prior thereto by publication one (1) time in one (1) or more daily or weekly newspapers published in the town, city, or county using the devices, if a newspaper is published therein;

(2)

The public test shall be open to representatives of the political parties, candidates, the press, and the public;

(3)(A)

The public test shall be conducted by processing predetermined results from a group of ballots marked to record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each measure for each precinct or voting location.

(B)

Prior to the start of the public test, a printout shall be generated to show that no votes are recorded on the electronic vote tabulating device.

(C)

The public test shall include for each office one (1) or more ballots which have votes in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the electronic vote tabulating devices to reject such votes;

(4)

If any error is detected, the cause shall be ascertained and corrected, and an errorless count shall be made before the electronic vote tabulating device or devices are certified for use in the election; and

(5)

Upon completion of the public test, the electronic vote tabulating devices shall be cleared of any votes cast during the test.

(c)

After completion of the logic and accuracy test and the public test, the county board of election commissioners shall certify the accuracy of the voting system by sending a copy of the electronic results to the Secretary of State and filing the test results with the county clerk.

(d)(1)

Before the opening of the polls, the poll workers shall generate a printout from the electronic vote tabulating device or devices to verify that the candidates and measures are correct for the location and that no votes are recorded on the electronic vote tabulating device or devices.

(2)

The poll workers shall sign and post the printout upon the wall of the polling room where it shall remain throughout the election day.

(3)

The certified printout shall be filed with the election returns.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1803; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 27; 2005, No. 2233, § 43; 2009, No. 959, § 29; 2009, No. 1480, § 39; 2015, No. 1218, § 19; 2017, No. 164, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” in (b)(1) and (b)(2).

The 2009 amendment by No. 1480 rewrote (a)(2).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(2); redesignated former (a)(3) through (a)(7) as (b); inserted the introductory language of (b); rewrote present (b)(1); inserted “public” preceding “test” throughout (b)(2) and (b)(3); substituted “public test” for “testing” in (b)(5); redesignated and rewrote former (a)(8) as (c); and redesignated former (b) as (d).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(2), substituted “days before” for “days prior to” and inserted “except a runoff election as described in subdivision (a)(3) of this section”; and added (a)(3).

7-5-612. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning absentee ballots, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 446, § 28. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 77, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1804.

7-5-613. Counting ballots and write-in votes.

In precincts where an electronic vote tabulating device is used, as soon as the polls are closed:

(1)

The poll workers shall compare the total number of voters indicated by the electronic vote tabulating device with the list of voters to ensure that the number recorded by the tabulator is the same as the number of voters shown on the list of voters who received a ballot at the polling site. If the totals are different, this fact shall be reported in writing to the county board of election commissioners with the reasons, if known; and

(2)

The poll workers shall count the write-in votes and prepare a return of the votes on forms provided for that purpose.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1805; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 29; 2005, No. 2233, § 44; 2009, No. 959, § 30.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” in (1) and (2).

7-5-614. Locations for vote tabulation — Procedures.

For the tabulation of votes of a precinct by electronic vote tabulating devices at a central counting location:

(1)(A)

The poll workers shall place all ballots that have been cast in the container provided for that purpose.

(B)

The container shall be sealed and delivered to the county board of election commissioners forthwith by the poll workers together with the unused, void, and defective ballots; and

(2)

All proceedings at the counting location shall be under the direction of the county board of election commissioners with respect to all elections.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1805; Acts 1993, No. 511, § 3; 1997, No. 446, § 30; 2005, No. 2233, § 45; 2007, No. 835, § 8; 2009, No. 959, § 30.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” in (1)(A) and (1)(B); deleted (2)(B); redesignated the remaining subdivision of (2) accordingly; and deleted “at least two (2) election officials named by” following “direction of” in (2).

7-5-615. Tabulation of votes — Defective ballots — Certification of returns.

(a)

The counting of votes by electronic vote tabulating devices at the courthouse or other central counting location shall be open to the public, and any candidate or political party may be present in person or by representative designated in writing pursuant to §7-5-312 to view the counting.

(b)

No person except those employed and authorized for that purpose shall touch any ballot or return.

(c)

The election officials at the counting place and all persons operating the electronic vote tabulating devices shall take the same oath required by law for election officials before entering upon their duties.

(d)

If any ballot is damaged or defective so that it cannot properly be counted by the electronic vote tabulating device, a true duplicate copy shall be made of the damaged ballot in the presence of tabulation election officials if the votes are tabulated at a central location. The duplicate shall be substituted for the damaged ballot. All duplicate ballots shall be clearly labeled “duplicate” and shall be counted in lieu of the damaged or defective ballot.

(e)

The return printed by the electronic vote tabulating device, to which has been added the return of write-in, early, and absentee votes, shall constitute the official return of each polling site. All returns shall be certified by the election officials in charge of the tabulation thereof in the manner provided by law.

(f)

Upon completion of the count, the returns shall be open to the public.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 77, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1805; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 31; 2003, No. 1154, § 5; 2005, No. 2233, § 46; 2007, No. 835, § 9.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “Defective ballots” for “Defective vote cards” in the section heading; and substituted “polling site” for “precinct” in (e).

7-5-616. Penalty.

A person who violates this subchapter shall be subject to the same fine and imprisonment as provided by law for violating the comparable provisions of the laws of this state regarding voting by other voting methods.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 40.

Publisher's Notes.

The former §7-5-616, concerning use of ultraviolet ink in lieu of a black-out sticker, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 446, § 32. The section was derived from Acts 1993, No. 1297, § 1.

Subchapter 7

— Returns and Canvass

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 2001, No. 1789, § 12: Emergency clause failed. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that Amendment 80 to the Arkansas Constitution becomes effective on July 1, 2001; that this implements the nonpartisan election of justices and judges as mandated by Amendment 80; and that to effectively implement Amendment 80, this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 48: Jan. 1, 2006.

7-5-701. Declaration of results — Certification, delivery, and custody of returns.

(a)(1)

No earlier than forty-eight (48) hours after the election and no later than the fifteenth calendar day after the election, the county board of election commissioners, from the certificates and ballots received from the several precincts, shall proceed to ascertain, declare, and certify the result of the election to the Secretary of State.

(2)

Unopposed candidates, other than candidates for mayor, governor, city clerk, and circuit clerk, shall be separately declared and certified to the Secretary of State as elected in the same manner as if the candidate had been voted upon at the election.

(3)(A)

As results are received and tabulated on election night for all state and federal elections, the county board of election commissioners shall declare preliminary and unofficial results of the election as soon as early voting, absentee, or individual precinct results are tabulated on election night and immediately shall transmit the results by precinct to the Secretary of State through the election night reporting interface provided by the Secretary of State.

(B)

The county board of election commissioners may, by agreement with the county clerk, transmit the results to the county clerk who immediately shall transmit the results by precinct to the Secretary of State under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section.

(C)

On election night for all state and federal elections, immediately after the count of the vote is complete, the county board of election commissioners shall:

(i)

Declare preliminary and unofficial results of the election, including a statement of the number of outstanding:

(a)

Ballots of voters who requested ballots under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.; and

(b)

Provisional ballots; and

(ii)

Immediately transmit the results by precinct to the Secretary of State through the election night reporting interface provided by the Secretary of State.

(D)

The county board of election commissioners may, by agreement with the county clerk, transmit the results to the county clerk who shall immediately transmit the results by precinct to the Secretary of State as described in subdivision (a)(3)(C) of this section.

(E)

The Secretary of State may establish policies and procedures to accomplish the objectives set forth under this section.

(4)

Within nineteen (19) calendar days after any general, special, or school election, the county board of election commissioners shall deliver a certificate of election to the person having the highest number of legal votes for any county office.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners shall also file in the office of the clerk of the county court a certificate setting forth in detail the result of the election in each precinct.

(c)(1)

No earlier than forty-eight (48) hours after the election and no later than the fifteenth calendar day after the election, the county board of election commissioners shall deposit certified copies of the abstracts of the returns of the election for members of the United States Congress and for all executive, legislative, and judicial officers in the nearest post office on the most direct route to the seat of government and directed to the Secretary of State.

(2)

Separate from an abstract, the county board of election commissioners shall certify all unopposed candidates for these offices as elected in the same manner as if the candidate had been voted upon at the election.

(3)

The county board of election commissioners shall not receive compensation for election duties after the election until the election results have been certified and delivered to the Secretary of State.

(4)

The Secretary of State shall file a complaint with the State Board of Election Commissioners under §7-4-120 if the county board of election commissioners does not comply with subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

(d)(1)

It shall at the same time enclose in a separate envelope and direct to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, in care of the Secretary of State, at the seat of government, a certified copy of the abstract of votes given for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, and Attorney General.

(2)

It is the duty of the Secretary of State to safely keep the returns addressed to the Speaker of the House of Representatives until they shall be required for the purpose of ascertaining and declaring the result of the election as prescribed in Arkansas Constitution, Article 6, § 3.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 8, § 1; 1971, No. 261, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-801; Acts 1993, No. 512, § 3; 1993, No. 966, § 1; 1995, No. 441, § 1; 1995, No. 723, § 1; 1995, No. 724, § 1; 1999, No. 1304, § 1; 2001, No. 1475, § 1; 2003, No. 131, § 1; 2005, No. 731, § 1; 2005, No. 895, § 1; 2005, No. 1677, § 5; 2013, No. 1058, § 1; 2013, No. 1211, § 5; 2017, No. 730, § 3; 2019, No. 254, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1058 rewrote (a)(2).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1211 added “in each precinct” in (b).

The 2017 amendment inserted present (a)(2) and (c)(2); redesignated former (a)(2), (a)(3) as present (a)(3), (a)(4); substituted “under subdivision (a)(3)(A)” for “as described under subdivision (2)(A)” in present (a)(3)(B); substituted “subdivision (a)(3)(C)” for “subdivision (2)(C)” in (a)(3)(D); redesignated former (c)(2) and (c)(3) as present (c)(3) and (c)(4); and substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in (c)(4).

The 2019 amendment inserted “city clerk” in (a)(2).

7-5-702. Preservation of ballots, stubs, certificates, and other election materials.

(a)

After the election has been finally certified by the county board of election commissioners, the county board of election commissioners shall retain the custody of and safely keep in a sealed container appropriately marked in a secure location in the county courthouse or other county storage facility all ballots, ballot stubs, and certificates returned to it from the several precincts for a period of twenty (20) days, after which time the ballots and certificates shall be stored in a secure location in the county courthouse or other county storage facility for a period of two (2) years from the date of the election, unless the county board of election commissioners shall be sooner notified in writing that:

(1)

The election of some person voted for at the election and declared to have been elected has been contested;

(2)

Criminal prosecution has begun before a tribunal of competent jurisdiction against any officer of election or person voting thereat for any fraud in the election; or

(3)

The results of the election will be audited by the State Board of Election Commissioners under §7-4-121.

(b)

If the county board of election commissioners is notified as provided in subsection (a) of this section, then so many of the ballots and certificates as may relate to matters involved in the contest or any prosecution shall be preserved for use as evidence in the contest or prosecution.

(c)

During the time the ballots may be retained or stored, the package containing them shall not be opened by anyone unless:

(1)

Directed to do so by some competent tribunal before which an election contest or prosecution is pending in which the ballots are to be used as evidence; or

(2)

Upon written instruction signed by the Director of the State Board of Election Commissioners under §7-4-121.

(d)

For twenty (20) days, the county board of election commissioners shall retain the custody of ballot stubs in an appropriately marked, sealed container delivered to the county board of election commissioners from the several precincts, after which time they shall be stored in a secure location in the county courthouse or other county storage facility unless:

(1)

An election contest has been filed;

(2)

A criminal prosecution has been initiated in connection with the election; or

(3)

Upon written instruction signed by the director under §7-4-121.

(e)

After a period of two (2) years, all marked ballots and ballot stubs may be destroyed in the following manner:

(1)

The county board of election commissioners shall enter an order directing the destruction of marked ballots and ballot stubs;

(2)

The county board of election commissioners shall make and retain a record of marked ballots and ballot stubs destroyed; and

(3)

The county board of election commissioners shall file with the county clerk the order and record pertaining to marked ballots and ballot stubs destroyed.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 8, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-802; Acts 1987, No. 492, § 1; 1997, No. 446, § 33; 2005, No. 953, § 1; 2005, No. 2233, § 47; 2009, No. 959, § 31; 2013, No. 236, § 2; 2017, No. 621, § 3; 2019, No. 888, §§ 3, 4.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “After the election has been finally certified by the county board of election commissioners” in (a); deleted (f); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (d); inserted “and ballot stubs” in (e), (e)(1) and (e)(2); and, in (e)(3), inserted “with the county clerk” following “board shall file” and deleted “with the county clerk” at the end.

The 2017 amendment inserted “ballot stubs” in (a).

The 2019 amendment added (a)(3); redesignated part of (c) as (c)(1); added (c)(2); in (d), substituted “board of election commissioners” for “treasurer” preceding “shall retain” and substituted “the county board of election commissioners” for “him or her”; redesignated part of (d) as (d)(1) and (d)(2); and added (d)(3).

Cross References.

Miscellaneous felonies — Penalties, §7-1-104.

7-5-703. Votes for United States Congress — Tie vote.

(a)

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State, in the presence of the Governor, within thirty (30) days after the time allowed to make returns of election by the county board of election commissioners, or sooner, if all the returns have been received, to cast up and arrange the votes from the several counties, or such of them as may have made returns, for each person voted for as United States Senator or United States Representative.

(b)

The Governor shall immediately thereafter issue his or her proclamation declaring the person having the greatest number of legal votes to be duly elected to represent this state in the United States Senate or the United States House of Representatives and shall grant a certificate thereof, under the seal of the state, to the person so elected.

(c)(1)

Should any two (2) or more persons have an equal number of votes, and a higher number than any other person, the names of the two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes for United States Senator or United States Representative shall be certified to a special runoff election which shall be held four (4) weeks from the day on which the general election is held.

(2)

The special runoff election shall be conducted in the same manner as is provided by law, and the election results shall be canvassed and certified in the manner provided by law.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 8, §§ 3, 4; 1971, No. 261, §§ 15, 16; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-803, 3-804; Acts 1997, No. 446, § 34; 2017, No. 1104, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (c) as (c)(1) and (c)(2); in (c)(1), substituted “United States Representative” for “Representative” and substituted “four (4) weeks” for “three (3) weeks”; and deleted “now” preceding “provided” in (c)(2).

7-5-704. Votes for legislative, judicial, and executive officers — Tie vote.

(a)

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State, in the presence of the Governor, within thirty (30) days after the time allowed in this subchapter to make returns of elections by the county board of election commissioners, or sooner, if all the returns have been received, to cast up and arrange the votes from the several counties for each person who received votes for any legislative, judicial, or executive office, except the offices named in Arkansas Constitution, Article 6, § 3. The persons who have received the greatest number of legal votes for Justice of the Supreme Court and Commissioner of State Lands, within the state; judges of the Court of Appeals and of the circuit courts, and prosecuting attorneys, in their respective districts or circuits; judges of the county and probate courts, circuit clerk, county clerk, sheriff, coroner, surveyor, and assessor, in their respective counties; and all other officers required by law, shall be commissioned by the Governor.

(b)(1)

If two (2) or more persons have an equal number of votes for the same office and a higher number than any other person, the names of the two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes for any legislative or executive office, except those offices named in Arkansas Constitution, Article 6, § 3, and constables, shall be certified to a special runoff election which shall be held four (4) weeks from the day on which the general election is held.

(2)

The special runoff election shall be conducted in the same manner as is now provided by law, and the election results thereof shall be canvassed and certified in the manner provided by law.

(c)

Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to the offices of Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, or district judge.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 8, §§ 5, 6; 1971, No. 261, §§ 17, 18; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-805, 3-806; Acts 1993, No. 512, § 4; 1997, No. 446, § 35; 2001, No. 1789, § 5; 2009, No. 959, § 32; 2017, No. 1104, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted “immediately” preceding “commissioned by the Governor” in (a); deleted “judicial” following “legislative” in (b)(1); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (b) as (b)(1) and (b)(2); and substituted “four (4) weeks” for “three (3) weeks” in (b)(1).

7-5-705. Votes for constitutional officers — Tie vote — Certificate of election.

(a)

During the first week of the session after each election for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, and Attorney General, and in the presence of both houses of the General Assembly, the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall open and publish the votes cast and given for each of the respective officers previously mentioned.

(b)

The person having the greatest number of legal votes for each of the respective offices shall be declared duly elected thereto, but if two (2) or more shall be equal and highest in votes for the same office, one (1) of them shall be chosen by a joint vote of both houses of the General Assembly, and a majority of all the members elected shall be necessary to a choice.

(c)

The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall make and deposit in the office of the Secretary of State a certificate declaring what person has been elected to any office named.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 8, § 8; 1971, No. 261, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-808; Acts 1993, No. 512, § 5.